Washington statutes.
RCW 19.64.010

Liability of owner or operator limited.

Where the owner, licensee, or operator of a radio or television broadcasting station, or the agents or employees thereof, has required a person speaking over said station to submit a written copy of his or her script prior to such broadcast and has cut such speaker off the air as soon as reasonably possible in the event such speaker deviates from such written script, said owner, licensee, or operator, or the agents or employees thereof, shall not be liable for any damages, for any defamatory statement published or uttered by such person in or as a part of such radio or television broadcast unless such defamatory statements are contained in said written script.

[ 2011 c 336 s 543; 1943 c 229 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 998-1.]